Utah statutes.
31A-23a-412.   Place of business and residence address -- Records.
(1) (a)  All licensees under this chapter shall register with the commissioner
the address and telephone numbers of their principal place of business.
(b)  If the licensee is an individual, in addition to complying with
Subsection (1)(a) the individual shall provide to the commissioner the
individual's residence address and telephone number.
(c)  A licensee shall notify the commissioner within 30 days of any change of
address or telephone number.
(2) (a)  Except as provided under Subsection (3), every licensee under this
chapter shall keep at the principal place of business address registered under
Subsection (1), separate and distinct books and records of all transactions
consummated under the Utah license.
(b)  The books and records described in Subsection (2)(a) shall:
(i)  be in an organized form;
(ii)  be available to the commissioner for inspection upon reasonable notice;
and
(iii)  include all of the following:
(A)  if the licensee is a producer, limited line producer, consultant,
managing general agent, or reinsurance intermediary:
(I)  a record of each insurance contract procured by or issued through the
licensee, with the names of insurers and insureds, the amount of premium and
commissions or other compensation, and the subject of the insurance;
(II)  the names of any other producers, limited line producers, consultants,
managing general agents, or reinsurance intermediaries from whom business is
accepted, and of persons to whom commissions or allowances of any kind are
promised or paid; and
(III)  a record of all consumer complaints forwarded to the licensee by an
insurance regulator;
(B)  if the licensee is a consultant, a record of each agreement outlining the
work performed and the fee for the work; and
(C)  any additional information which:
(I)  is customary for a similar business; or
(II)  may reasonably be required by the commissioner by rule.
(3)  Subsection (2) is satisfied if the books and records specified in
Subsection (2) can be obtained immediately from a central storage place or
elsewhere by on-line computer terminals located at the registered address.
(4)  A licensee who represents only a single insurer satisfies Subsection (2)
if the insurer maintains the books and records pursuant to Subsection (2) at a
place satisfying Subsections (1) and (5).
(5) (a)  The books and records maintained under Subsection (2) or Section 31A-
23a-413 shall be available for the inspection of the commissioner during all
business hours for a period of time after the date of the transaction as
specified by the commissioner by rule, but in no case for less than the
current calendar year plus three years.
(b)  Discarding books and records after the applicable record retention period
has expired does not place the licensee in violation of a later-adopted longer
record retention period.
